Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 30 INCOME TAX
§ 63-3030. Persons required to make returns of income.

Returns with respect to taxes measured by income in this chapter shall be made by the following:

Every resident individual required to file a federal return under section 6012(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Any nonresident individual having for the current taxable year a gross income from Idaho sources in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or any part-year resident individual having for the current taxable year a gross income from all sources while domiciled in or residing in Idaho, and from Idaho sources while not domiciled in and not residing in Idaho, which in total are in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500);

Every corporation which is transacting business in this state, authorized to transact business in this state or having income attributable to this state, unless exempt from the tax imposed in this chapter;

Every corporation reporting as an S corporation pursuant to Internal Revenue Code sections 1361 through 1379 to the federal government, which is transacting business in this state, or is authorized to transact business in this state. A corporation which is reporting as an S corporation to the federal government must report to the state of Idaho as an S corporation for and during the same period or periods in which its election to report as such a corporation is effective for federal tax purposes and must identify itself as an S corporation on its income tax return filed with this state;

Every estate, the residence of which estate is in Idaho, having a gross income of six hundred dollars ($600) or more for the current taxable year;

Every estate, the residence of which is in a state other than Idaho, having a gross income from Idaho sources in excess of six hundred dollars ($600);

Every trust required to file a federal return under the Internal Revenue Code, the residence of which trust is in Idaho, having gross income of one hundred dollars ($100) or more for the current taxable year;

Every trust required to file a federal return under the Internal Revenue Code, the residence of which is in a state other than Idaho, having a gross income from Idaho sources in excess of one hundred dollars ($100);

Every partnership which transacts business in this state. Such return shall be a supplemental information return and shall include the names and addresses of the persons who would be entitled to share in the net income of the partnership if distributed and the amount of the distributive share of each person. Such return shall be signed by one (1) of the partners.

Returns of fiduciaries and receivers:

Fiduciaries and receivers shall file returns with the state tax commission in accordance with the provisions of section 6012(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

§ 63-3030A. Mandate to compel return.

If a taxpayer fails to file a return within sixty (60) days of the time prescribed by this chapter, a district judge of the county within which the taxpayer resides or has its principal place of business or of Ada county in the case of a nonresident taxpayer or one having its principal place of business outside the state, upon petition of the state tax commission, shall issue a writ of mandate requiring the person to file a return. The petition shall be returnable not later than twenty-eight (28) days after the filing of the petition. The petition shall be heard and determined on the return day or on such day thereafter as the court shall fix, having regard to the speediest possible determination of the case, consistent with the rights of the parties. The judgment shall include costs in favor of the prevailing party. Proceedings upon such suits shall be in accordance with chapter 3, title 7, Idaho Code.

Nothing in this section shall limit the remedies otherwise available to the state tax commission under this chapter or any other laws of this state.

§ 63-3031. Joint returns.

A husband and wife may make a single return jointly even though one of the spouses has neither gross income nor deductions, except as provided below:

No joint return shall be made if, during the current taxable year, either the husband or the wife is a nonresident alien of the United States, unless they elect to file a joint return for federal purposes pursuant to sections 6013(g) and (h) of the Internal Revenue Code.

No joint return shall be made if husband and wife have different taxable years, unless the difference in taxable years is the result of the death of either or both of them; except that if either spouse changes his annual accounting period during the taxable year, or if the surviving spouse remarries within the taxable year no such return shall be filed.

For the purpose of subsection (2) of this section [paragraph (2) of this subsection], the joint return, if permitted, shall be treated as if the taxable years of both spouses ended on the date of the closing of the surviving spouse’s taxable year.

In the case of death of one spouse or both spouses the joint return with respect to the decedent may be made only by his executor or administrator; except that in the case of the death of one spouse the joint return may be made by the surviving spouse with respect to both himself and the decedent if no return for the taxable year has been made by the decedent, no executor or administrator has been appointed, and no executor or administrator is appointed before the last day prescribed by law for filing the return of the surviving spouse. If an executor or administrator of the decedent is appointed after the making of the joint return by the surviving spouse, the executor or administrator may disaffirm such joint return by making, within one (1) year after the last day prescribed by law for filing the return of the surviving spouse, a separate return for the taxable year of the decedent with respect to which the joint return was made, in which case the return made by the survivor shall constitute his separate return.

Definitions. For purposes of this section—

The status as husband and wife of two (2) individuals having taxable years beginning on the same day shall be determined

if both have the same taxable year — as of the close of such year; and

if one dies before the close of the taxable year of the other — as of the time of such death; and

An individual who is legally separated from his spouse under a decree of divorce or of separate maintenance shall not be considered as married; and

If a joint return is made, the tax shall be computed on the aggregate income and the liability with respect to the tax shall be joint and several.

Husbands and wives shall, if they elect to file a joint return for federal purposes, be required to file a joint return for state purposes.

§ 63-3032. Time for filing income tax returns.

Except as provided in section 63-3033, Idaho Code:

Returns made on the basis of the calendar year shall be filed in the office of the Idaho state tax commission on or before the fifteenth day of April following the close of the calendar year and returns made on the basis of a fiscal year shall be filed in the office of the Idaho state tax commission on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the close of the fiscal year.

In the case of a return for any period of less than one (1) year, the return shall be filed on or before the date required in this section, or on or before such date as required for such tax period by the Internal Revenue Code, whichever is later.

Returns made by farmer’s cooperatives to the extent the cooperative is taxable under section 63-3025B, Idaho Code, shall be due on or before September 15 following the close of the calendar year or on or before the fifteenth day of the ninth month following the close of the fiscal year. The provisions of section 63-3033, Idaho Code, shall not apply to returns due under this subsection.

§ 63-3033. Extension of time.

Taxpayers shall have an automatic extension of time for filing any return, declaration, statement or other document required by this chapter for a period of six (6) months if on or before the unextended due date the taxpayer has paid at least eighty percent (80%) of the total tax due on the income tax return when it is filed, or the total tax due on the income tax return for the prior year if a return was filed for the prior year.

If, on the unextended due date, the payment required to meet the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, after consideration of any previous credits or payments applicable to the return, is fifty dollars ($50.00) or less, such payment shall not be required in order to qualify for the extension. However, interest shall accrue as provided in subsection (g) of this section. Payment of any balance of tax is due on the earlier of the extended due date or the date the return is filed.

Taxpayers residing outside any of the United States and Puerto Rico (including persons in military or naval service) shall have an automatic extension of time within which to file income tax returns with this state for a period which shall expire on the fifteenth day of the sixth month following the close of their taxable year.

Individuals who are entitled to extensions for filing federal income tax returns as a result of the application of the provisions of sections 911 and 7508 of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be entitled to extensions of time for the same period for filing income tax returns with the state of Idaho subject to the requirements imposed in implementation of the indicated sections.

Any taxpayer entitled to an extension under subsection (c) or (d) of this section shall attach a statement to his return claiming his right to the extension.

If the amount of payment made under subsection (a) of this section is less than eighty percent (80%) of the total tax due under the provisions of this chapter and is less than the amount of the total tax due on the income tax return for the prior year, except as permitted by subsection (b) of this section, a penalty may be applied to the total of the balance due unless reasonable cause can be established. The penalty shall be:

If the taxes for the taxable year are paid on or before the extended due date, two percent (2%) per month from the original due date to the date of payment.

If the taxes for the taxable year are not paid on or before the extended due date, the penalty provided in section 63-3046(c), Idaho Code, from the original due date.

In all cases of an extension of time in which to file any return, except for those related to section 7508 of the Internal Revenue Code, interest shall be paid on any tax due from the original due date to date of payment at the rate provided in section 63-3045, Idaho Code. For an individual entitled to an extension of time allowed by subsection (d) of this section and section 7508 of the Internal Revenue Code, interest shall be paid on any tax due from the extended due date allowed in subsection (d) of this section to the date of payment.

§ 63-3034. Payment of tax.

The entire tax imposed by this chapter shall be paid to the state tax commission on or before the date, including any extensions of the due date, upon which the return must be filed with the state tax commission, provided that payments made before the termination of the year for which taxes are paid shall be (1) based upon the taxpayer’s estimate of total state tax liability or (2) when the estimated gross income of any such taxpayer is more than six hundred dollars ($600) and the state tax commission deems it necessary to insure compliance with this chapter, the commission may require any persons subject to this chapter to place with the commission such security as the commission may determine.

The amount of the security shall be fixed by the tax commission but shall not be greater than twice the amount of tax estimated to be due, or twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), whichever is less. The amount of the security may be increased or decreased by the tax commission at any time within the limitations set forth in this subsection.

If the tax commission finds that a taxpayer of whom security is required fails to furnish the security, the tax commission may issue a jeopardy assessment as prescribed by section 63-3065, Idaho Code, and take appropriate action to effect collection of the required security.

The tax commission may sell the security at public auction or, in the case of security in the form of bearer bonds issued by the United States or the state of Idaho which have a prevailing market price, at a private sale at a price not lower than the prevailing market price if it becomes necessary to make such sale in order to recover any tax, interest or penalties due on any amount required to be collected. Notice of the sale must be given to the person who deposited the security at least ten (10) days before the sale; such notice may be given personally or by mail addressed to the person at the address furnished to the tax commission and as it appears in the records of the tax commission. Upon such sale, any surplus above the amounts due shall be returned to the person who placed the security.

§ 63-3035. State withholding tax on percentage basis — Withholding, collection and payment of tax.

Every employer who is required under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code to withhold, collect and pay income tax on wages or salaries paid by such employer to any employee (other than employees specified in Internal Revenue Code section 3401(a)(2)) shall, at the time of such payment of wages, salary, bonus or other emolument to such employee, deduct and retain therefrom an amount substantially equivalent to the tax reasonably calculated by the state tax commission to be due from the employee under this chapter. The state tax commission shall prepare tables showing amounts to be withheld, and shall supply same to each employer subject to this section. In the event that an employer can demonstrate administrative inconvenience in complying with the exact requirements set forth in these tables, he may, with the consent of the state tax commission and upon application to it, use a different method which will produce substantially the same amount of taxes withheld. Every employer making payments of wages or salaries earned in Idaho, regardless of the place where such payment is made:

Shall be liable to the state of Idaho for the payment of the tax required to be deducted and withheld under this section and shall not be liable to any individual for the amount deducted from his wages and paid over in compliance or intended compliance with this section;

Must pay to the state tax commission monthly on or before the twentieth day of the succeeding month, or at such other times as the state tax commission may allow, an amount of tax which, under the provisions of this chapter, he is required to deduct and withhold;

Shall register with the state tax commission, in the manner prescribed by it, to establish an employer’s withholding account number. The account number will be used to report all amounts withheld for the annual reconciliation required in this section, and for such other purposes relating to withholding as the state tax commission may require; and

Must, notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, if the amount of withholding of such employer for the preceding twelve (12) month period equals or exceeds two hundred forty thousand dollars ($240,000) per annum or an average of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per month per annum, pay to the state tax commission on the basis of two (2) withholding periods. The first period shall begin on the first day of the month and end on the fifteenth day of the same month, and payment shall be made not later than the twentieth day of the same month. The second period shall begin on the sixteenth day of the same month and end on the last day of the same month, and payment shall be made not later than the fifth day of the following month. An employer meeting the withholding threshold requirements of this subsection, but only having one (1) pay period per month, may, upon request to and approval by the state tax commission, pay in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection.

If a payment required pursuant to paragraph (2) or (4) of this subsection is not made or is made delinquently or if made is not equal to the withholding required under this section, the state tax commission may treat the failure as a failure to file a return and may take administrative and judicial actions as authorized by this chapter in the case of a failure to file a return. Interest, at the rate provided by section 63-3045, Idaho Code, shall apply to any such underpayment.
(6) Commencing in 2006, the state tax commission shall determine whether the threshold amounts established by paragraph (4) of this subsection must be adjusted to reflect fluctuations in the cost of living. The state tax commission shall base its determination on the cumulative effect of the annual cost-of-living percentage modifications determined by the United States secretary of health and human services pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 415(i). When the cumulative percentage applied to the monthly threshold amount equals or exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), the commission shall promulgate a rule adjusting the monthly threshold amount by five thousand dollars ($5,000) and making the necessary proportional adjustment to the annual threshold amount. The rule shall be effective for the next succeeding calendar year and each year thereafter until again adjusted by the commission. The tax commission shall determine subsequent adjustments in the same manner, in each case using the year of the last adjustment as the base year.

In addition to the payments required pursuant to subsection (a)(2) and (4) of this section, every employer shall file a return upon such form as shall be prescribed by the state tax commission, but not more frequently than annually, or as required pursuant to any agreement between the state tax commission and the department of labor under section 63-3035B, Idaho Code, unless a shorter filing period and due date is prescribed by the state tax commission. The return shall be due on the last day of the first month following the end of the period to which the return relates. The return shall:
(b)(1) In addition to the payments required pursuant to subsection (a)(2) and (4) of this section, every employer shall file a return upon such form as shall be prescribed by the state tax commission, but not more frequently than annually, or as required pursuant to any agreement between the state tax commission and the department of labor under section 63-3035B, Idaho Code, unless a shorter filing period and due date is prescribed by the state tax commission. The return shall be due on the last day of the first month following the end of the period to which the return relates. The return shall:

Show, for the period to which it relates, the total amount of wages, salary, bonus or other emolument paid to his employees, the amount deducted therefrom in accordance with the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, the amount deducted therefrom in accordance with the provisions of this section, the amount of any previous payments made pursuant to this section, the amount of any deficiency due from the employer or refund payable by the state tax commission and such pertinent and necessary information as the state tax commission may require.

Include a copy of the declaration of withholding provided to employees pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection.

Every employer making a declaration of withholding as provided herein shall furnish to the employees annually, but not later than thirty (30) days after the end of the calendar year, a record of the amount of tax withheld from such employee on forms to be prescribed, prepared and furnished by the state tax commission.

Every employer who is required, under Internal Revenue Code section 6011, to file returns on magnetic media, machine readable form or electronic means, as defined in the Idaho uniform electronic transactions act, may be required by rules of the state tax commission to file corresponding state returns on similar magnetic media, machine readable form or electronic means. Such rules may provide a different due date for such returns, which shall be no later than the date employers are required to file such returns with the internal revenue service or the social security administration and shall provide a five (5) business day period for an employer to correct errors in the electronic file received by the due date.

All moneys deducted and withheld by every employer shall immediately upon such deduction be state money and every employer who deducts and retains any amount of money under the provisions of this chapter shall hold the same in trust for the state of Idaho and for the payment thereof to the state tax commission in the manner and at the times in this chapter provided. Any employer who does not possess real property situated within the state of Idaho, which, in the opinion of the state tax commission, is of sufficient value to cover his probable tax liability, may be required to post a surety bond in such sum as the state tax commission shall deem adequate to protect the state.

The provisions of this chapter relating to additions to tax in case of delinquency, and penalties, shall apply to employers subject to the provisions of this section and for these purposes any amount deducted, or required to be deducted and remitted to the state tax commission under this section, shall be considered to be the tax of the employer and with respect to such amount he shall be considered the taxpayer.

Amounts deducted from wages of an employee during any calendar year in accordance with the provisions of this section shall be considered to be in part payment of the tax imposed on such employee for his tax year, which begins within such calendar year, and the return made by the employer under this subsection shall be accepted by the state tax commission as evidence in favor of the employee of the amount so deducted from his wages. Where the total amount so deducted exceeds the amount of tax on the employee, based on his Idaho taxable income, or where his income is not taxable under this chapter, the state tax commission shall, after examining the annual return filed by the employee in accordance with this chapter, but not later than sixty (60) days after the filing of each return, refund the amount of the excess deducted.

This section shall in no way relieve any taxpayer from his obligation of filing a return at the time required under this chapter, and, should the amount withheld under the provisions of this section be insufficient to pay the total tax of such taxpayer, such unpaid tax shall be paid at the time prescribed by section 63-3034, Idaho Code.

An employee receiving wages shall on any day be entitled to not more than, but may claim fewer than, the number of withholding allowances to which he is entitled under the Internal Revenue Code for federal income tax withholding purposes.

An employer shall use the allowance certificate filed by the employee with the employer under the withholding allowance provisions of the Internal Revenue Code in determining the amount of tax to be withheld from the employee’s wages or salary under this chapter. The state tax commission may redetermine the number of withholding allowances to which an employee is entitled under subsection (g) of this section, and the state tax commission may require such allowance certificate to be filed on a form prescribed by the commission in any circumstance where the commission finds that the allowance certificate filed for Internal Revenue Code purposes does not properly reflect the number of withholding allowances to which the employee is entitled under this chapter. In no event shall any employee give an allowance certificate which claims a higher number of withholding allowances than the number to which the employee is entitled by subsection (g) of this section.

§ 63-3035A. State income tax withholding tax on lottery winnings.

Whenever the Idaho state lottery is required by the Internal Revenue Code to withhold, collect and pay over income tax on any prize, proceeds or winnings it shall, at the time of payment of such prize, proceeds or winnings to the recipient, withhold from the payment an amount equal to the maximum percentage applicable to individuals under section 63-3024, Idaho Code, of the prize, proceeds or winnings to be applied to Idaho income taxes due from the recipient.

The state tax commission shall accept amounts withheld according to this section as payment by the recipient of the amount so withheld of income taxes imposed on the recipient for the taxable year in which the prize, proceeds or winnings are includable in the recipient’s Idaho taxable income.

When the total amount withheld (along with other credits due, withholding or payments attributable to the taxpayer) exceeds the taxes due from the recipient, the state tax commission shall, after examining the state income tax return filed by the recipient, refund the amount of the excess withheld in the manner provided for refunds of withholding under section 63-3035, Idaho Code.

The Idaho state lottery shall remit the amounts withheld to the state tax commission on or before the date similar payments and reports are due to the internal revenue service.

The Idaho state lottery shall furnish to the recipient, not later than thirty (30) days after the end of the calendar year, a record of the tax withheld during that year and shall, not later than the last day of the following February, file a copy of the record with the state tax commission.

The Idaho state lottery and the state tax commission may agree to different times and procedures for making the remittances or reports required in this section.

Nothing in this section relieves any taxpayer from an obligation to file a return or pay taxes at the time and in the manner required by this chapter.

§ 63-3035B. Joint power authorization.

The state tax commission may, pursuant to sections 67-2326 through 67-2333, Idaho Code, enter into an agreement with the department of labor providing for the joint administration of employment security taxes and income tax withholding through common registration of employers, common tax reporting forms, centralized filing of returns and receipting of revenue and effective exchange of information.

§ 63-3035C. Revocation and suspension of withholding accounts — Penalties.

An income tax withholding account issued under section 63-3035, Idaho Code, shall be held only by persons actively engaged in activities requiring such an account under this chapter. Any person not so engaged shall forthwith cancel his account number by notifying the state tax commission.

Whenever any person fails to comply with any provision of this chapter relating to the withholding, reporting or payment of income tax withholding or any rules of the commission relating to such withholding prescribed and adopted under this chapter, the state tax commission may revoke or suspend any withholding account held by the person or may deny a new account to such person.

The state tax commission may revoke the withholding account of a person not actively engaged in activities requiring an account under section 63-3035, Idaho Code.

Notice of revocation shall be given in the manner provided for deficiencies in taxes in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, which shall be subject to review as provided in that section.

A withholding account, held by a person who for a period of twelve (12) consecutive months reports no income tax withholding due under this chapter, shall expire automatically upon the state tax commission providing notice of the expiration to the last known address of the person to whom the account was issued.

A person who engages in activities requiring a withholding account under this chapter without such an account or after an account has been revoked or suspended, and any person who is a responsible person, as defined in section 63-3078, Idaho Code, of such a business shall, after receiving written notice from the state tax commission, be subject to a civil penalty not in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), and each day shall constitute a separate offense, which the state tax commission may assess as a deficiency pursuant to section 63-3045, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3036. State withholding tax for farmers.

Every farmer who is an employer required by the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code to withhold, collect, and pay income tax on wages paid by such employer to any employee shall at the time of the payment of wages, salaries, bonuses or other emoluments to an employee, deduct and retain therefrom an amount determined in accordance with section 63-3035, Idaho Code, and the amount so withheld and deducted shall be held by said farmer-employer in trust for the state of Idaho and for the payment thereof to the state tax commission. Provided, that no tax need be withheld from an employee whose wages, salaries, bonuses and other emoluments total less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the tax year.

The tax so withheld by a farmer-employer subject to this section shall be paid to the state tax commission on or before the date required by subsection (b)(1) of section 63-3035, Idaho Code.

The farmer-employer shall deliver to the state tax commission a return upon such form as shall be prescribed by said state tax commission showing the amounts of wages, salaries, bonuses or other emoluments paid to his employee, the amount deducted therefrom in accordance with this section, and such other pertinent and necessary information as the state tax commission may require on or before the date payments required by this section are due.

The farmer-employer making such a deduction as provided for in this section shall furnish to the employee annually, but not later than thirty (30) days after the end of the calendar year, a record of the amount of the tax withheld from such employee on forms to be prescribed, prepared and furnished by the state tax commission and at the same time every employer shall file a copy thereof with the state tax commission. The provisions of subsections (d), (e), (f), (g) and (h) of section 63-3035, Idaho Code, shall be applicable to the tax withheld by the farmer-employer under this section.

§ 63-3036A. Payment of estimated tax.

Any corporation subject to this chapter which is required to make a payment of estimated taxes to the internal revenue service and will have an Idaho income tax liability of five hundred dollars ($500) or more shall pay to the state tax commission estimated taxes due under this chapter.

The provisions of the Internal Revenue Code relating to determination of reporting periods and the due dates of payments of estimated tax shall apply to the estimated payments due under this section.

The amount of estimated tax due shall be determined as follows:

Commencing with the calendar quarter that begins July 1, 1987, in the case of any corporation which was required to pay tax under this chapter for its immediately preceding taxable year, the amount of each quarterly payment for its current taxable year shall be twenty-five percent (25%) of the lesser of:

The tax amount required to be reported on the return for the immediately preceding taxable year; or

Ninety percent (90%) of the tax required to be paid with the current year’s return.

Any corporation required to make estimated payments under this section and who makes annualized estimated payments under the Internal Revenue Code shall be permitted to annualize its estimated payments under this section in the manner prescribed by regulation of the state tax commission. Such regulations shall, to the extent practicable, follow the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations thereunder relating to annualization of estimated payments.

The amounts paid as estimated taxes pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall be considered to be in part payment of the tax imposed by this chapter on the person reporting such estimated tax. The part payment shall apply to such tax for the tax year during which the reporting period for which the estimate is made occurs. In the event that such part payments, together with all other part payments, estimated payments, withheld taxes or other credits allowable against the taxes imposed by this chapter shall exceed the amount of tax due, the state tax commission shall refund such excess within the time and in the manner prescribed in section 63-3072(c), Idaho Code, relating to refund of taxes withheld by employers.

The provisions of this section shall in no way relieve any person from any obligation to file a return under any provision of this chapter at the time such return may be due. In the event that the estimated payments required under this section, together with any other part payments, estimated payments, withheld taxes or other credits applicable to the same taxable year are less than the amount of taxes imposed by this chapter, the unpaid tax shall be paid at the time prescribed in section 63-3034, Idaho Code.

The payment due for the first full reporting period occurring after the effective date of this act, and the payment due for each of the next three (3) succeeding reporting periods shall be one-half (1/2) of the amount otherwise due under this section.

§ 63-3036B. Pass-through entities — Backup withholding.

A pass-through entity, as defined in section 63-3006C, Idaho Code, that is transacting business in Idaho during a taxable year shall withhold tax as prescribed in this section.

For each nonresident individual who has income described in subsection (2) of section 63-3022L, Idaho Code, the pass-through entity shall withhold tax on the individual’s share of income from the pass-through entity required to be included in Idaho taxable income of the individual, at the highest marginal rate applicable for the taxable year under section 63-3024, Idaho Code.

A pass-through entity is not required to withhold taxes under this section:

In regard to an individual who is a resident of Idaho as defined in section 63-3013, Idaho Code; or

If the pass-through entity is a publicly traded partnership, as defined in section 7704(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, that is treated as a partnership for purposes of the Internal Revenue Code and that has agreed to file an annual information return reporting the name, address, taxpayer identification number and other information requested by the state tax commission concerning each unitholder whose distributive share of partnership income from Idaho sources is more than five hundred dollars ($500); or

If withholding is not required pursuant to a rule adopted under this section; or

In regard to an individual who is not a resident of Idaho as defined in section 63-3013, Idaho Code, but for whom the pass-through entity has reported and paid the tax relating to said individual on a composite return pursuant to section 63-3022L, Idaho Code. An entity may rely upon information provided by the individual indicating state of residency as prescribed in the rules of the state tax commission.

A pass-through entity that is required to withhold tax under this section shall file a withholding return with the state tax commission setting forth the amount of income described in subsection (2) of section 63-3022L, Idaho Code, the amount of tax withheld under this section and any other information required by the state tax commission. The return shall be filed with the state tax commission on the form and taxes withheld under this section shall be paid to the state tax commission in the time and manner prescribed by rules of the state tax commission. To the extent the state tax commission finds practicable, the rules shall generally conform to the requirements of section 63-3035, Idaho Code.

A pass-through entity that is required to withhold tax under the provisions of this section shall furnish a statement to each individual on whose behalf tax is withheld. The statement shall state the amount of tax withheld on behalf of the individual for the taxable year of the pass-through entity. The statement shall be made on a form prescribed by the state tax commission and shall contain any other information required by it.

A pass-through entity is liable to this state for amounts of tax required to be withheld and paid under the provisions of this section. A pass-through entity is not liable to an officer, director, or individual owner of an interest in the pass-through entity for amounts required to be withheld under the provisions of this section that were paid to the state tax commission as prescribed in this section. Amounts required to be withheld and paid over to the state tax commission under this section that are not withheld or paid over at the time and in the manner required by the provisions of this section shall be a deficiency in tax as defined in section 63-3044, Idaho Code.
(7) For purposes of this section, “individual” shall have the same meaning as in subsection (6) of section 63-3022L, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3037. Information returns.

All persons, in whatever capacity, including lessees or mortgagors of real or personal property, fiduciaries and employers, making payment to another person of interest, rent, salaries, wages, except as provided by subsection (b) of section 63-3035, Idaho Code, and section 63-3036, Idaho Code, premiums, annuities, compensation, remunerations, emoluments, payments to subcontractors, other fixed or determinable gains, profits and income, or corporate liquidation distributions shall make returns to the state tax commission setting forth the amount of such gains, profits and income, and the name and address of the recipient of such payment. Such returns shall correspond to the requirements of the Internal Revenue Code, but shall be filed with the state tax commission on or before the last day of February of the year following the year to which the return relates.

The state tax commission may, by rule:

Excuse the filing of any returns required by subsection (a) of this section when it finds that the returns required of any class or group of persons do not contribute to the efficient administration of the taxes imposed by this chapter.

When necessary for the efficient administration of this section, set a different due date for the returns required by this section, provided however, such date shall not be earlier than the date required by the Internal Revenue Code for filing equivalent federal returns in a nonelectronic format.

The commission may prescribe rules providing standards consistent with section 63-115, Idaho Code, for determining which returns must be transmitted electronically. The commission may not require any person to transmit returns electronically unless such person is required to report on the return at least two hundred fifty (250) annual information returns. In promulgating such rules, the commission shall take into account, among other relevant factors, the ability of the taxpayer to comply, at a reasonable cost, with the requirements of such rules.